Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.800

Application of chapter to merged special purpose districts.

This chapter does not apply to the merger of irrigation districts authorized under RCW 87.03.530(2) and 87.03.845 through 87.03.855 or to the merger of a drainage improvement district, joint drainage improvement district, or consolidated drainage improvement district into an irrigation district authorized by RCW 87.03.720 through 87.03.745 and 85.08.830 through 85.08.890.

[ 1996 c 313 s 2; 1993 c 235 s 10.]